en: Without vegetable oils, without vegetable fats
bg: Без хидрогенирани масла
de: Ohne pfalnzliche Öle
es: Sin aceites vegetales
fi: kasviöljytön, ei kasviöljyjä, ilman kasviöljyjä
fr: Sans huiles végétales, sans matières grasses végétales
he: ללא שמנים מהצומח, ללא שומן מהצומח
hu: Növényi olajok nélkül, növényi zsírok nélkül
it: Senza oli vegetali
nl: Zonder plantaardige olieën
pt: Sem óleo vegetal, sem óleos vegetais
ru: без растительных жиров
zh: 不含植物油

en: Natural product
bg: Натурален продукт
ca: Producte natural
de: Naturprodukt, Natürliches Produkt
es: Producto natural
fr: Produit naturel
hr: prirodan proizvod, ovo je prirodan proizvod
pt: Produto natural

en: Natural product without vegetable oils, Natural product without vegetable fats
bg: Натурален продукт без растителни масла, Натурален продукт без растителни мазнини
ca: Producte natural sense olis vegetals
es: Producto natural sin aceites vegetales, Producto natural sin grasas vegetales
fi: kasviöljytön luontaistuote, luontaistuote ilman kasviöljyjä, luonnontuote ilman kasviöljyjä
fr: Produit naturel sans huiles végétales, Produit naturel sans matières grasses végétales
hu: Természetes termék növényi olajok nélkül, Természetes termék növényi zsírok nélkül
nl: Zonder plantaardige vetten
pt: Produto natural sem óleos vegetais, produto natural sem óleo vegetal
ru: натуральный продукт без растительных жиров

en: Natural ingredients, Ingredients from natural origins
sv: 100% naturliga råvaror

en: No MSG, MSG free
bg: Без глутамат, Без МНГ, Без Мононатриев глутамат
ca: Sense Glutamat Monosòdic, Sense GMS, Lliure de GMS
da: Uden MSG
de: kein MSG, MSG-frei, MSGfrei
es: Sin glutamato, Sin glutamato monosódico, Sin glutamato de sodio, Sin GMS
fi: natriumglutamaatiton, ei natriumglutamaattia, ilman natriumglutamaattia, MSG-vapaa
fr: Sans glutamate, sans GMS
he: בלי מונוסודיום גלוטומט
hu: MSG-mentes, Nátrium-glutamát mentes
it: Senza glutammato, senza glutammato monosodico, senza glutammato di sodio, senza MSG
pl: Bez glutaminianu sodu, Bez glutaminianu monosodowego
pt: Sem glutamato monossódico, sem MSG
sv: Utan MSG
th: ไม่ใช้ผงชูรส

en: No added MSG
bg: Без добавен глутамат
da: Uden tilsat MSG
es: Sin GMS añadido
fi: ei lisättyä natriumglutamaattia
fr: Sans glutamate ajouté, sans GMS ajouté
hu: Hozzáadott MSG nélkül, Hozzáadott nátrium-glutamát nélkül
nl: Geen mononatriumglutamaat toegevoegd, Geen vetsin toegevoegd
pl: Bez dodatku glutaminianu sodu, Bez dodatku glutaminianu monosodowego
pt: Nenhum MSG adicionado, Sem glutamato monossódico adicionado, sem MSG adicionado, nenhum MSG adicionado
sv: Utan tillsat MSG

en: No GMOs, Non GMO, GMO-free, GMOs-free, Without GMO, Without GMOs, No Genetically Modified Organisms, Without Genetically Modified Organisms, No GMO
bg: Без ГМО, Не съдържа ГМО
ca: Sense transgènics, Lliure de transgènics, Sense organismes modificats genèticament
cs: Bez GMO
de: gentechnikfrei
es: Sin OMG, Sin transgénicos, Sin OMGs, Sin Organismos Modificados Genéticamente
fi: GMO-vapaa, GM-vapaa, ilman GMO:ita, ei muuntogeenisiä organismeja, ilman muuntogeenisiä organismeja, tuotettu ilman geenitekniikka
fr: Sans OGM, Sans utilisation d'OGM
he: בלי הנדסה גנטית
hr: bez GMO-a
hu: GMO-mentes, nem génmódosított, Genetikailag módosított összetevőt nem tartalmaz, nem GMO
it: Senza OGM
nl: GMO-vrij, Geen GMO, GGO-vrij
pl: bez GMO
pt: Sem OGM, Sem Organismos Geneticamente Modificados
ru: Без ГМО, Без использования ГМО, Не содержит ГМО
sv: Innehåller inga genetiskt modifierade organismer
th: ไม่มีจีเอ็มโอ

en: Contains GMOs, with GMOs
bg: Съдържа ГМО, с ГМО
ca: Conté Transgènics
de: Enthält GVO
es: Contiene OMG
fi: Sisältää muuntogeenisiä organismeja (GMO)
fr: Contient des OGMs, Avec des OGMs
hu: génmódosított, GMO-tartalmú
it: Contiene OGM
pl: Zawiera GMO, z GMO
pt: Contém OGMs, com OGMs, contém OGM, com OGM, Com Organismos Geneticamente Modificados, Contém Organismos Geneticamente Modificados, feito Organismos Geneticamente Modificados, feito com OGM
th: มีส่วนผสมจีเอ็มโอ

en: Non GMO project
ca: NON GMO Project
es: Proyecto no OGM
fi: Non GMO project, Ei-GMO-projekti
it: Progetto non OGM
pt: Non GMO project, Projeto não OGM

de: Ohne Gentechnik
xx: Ohne Gentechnik

de: Ohne Gentechnik hergestellt, ARGE Gentechnik-frei
xx: Ohne Gentechnik hergestellt, ARGE Gentechnik-frei

en: French soy without GMOs
bg: Френска соя без ГМО
fr: Soja Français sans OGM, Soja Français garanti sans OGM
pt: Soja francesa sem OGM, soja francesa sem Organismos Geneticamente Modificados

en: Low lactose - Finland
fi: Vähälaktoosinen
sv: Laktosfattig

en: No lactose, lactose-free, Lactose free, without lactose
ar: خالي من اللاكتوز
bg: Без лактоза
ca: Sense lactosa, lliure de lactosa
cs: Bez laktózy, Přirozeně bez laktózy
cz: Bez laktozy
da: Laktosefri
de: Laktosefrei, Lactosefrei, frei von Laktose
el: Χωρίς λακτόζη
es: Sin lactosa, Sin lácteos
et: Laktoosivaba
fa: بدون لاکتوز
fi: laktoositon, ei laktoosia, ilman laktoosia
fr: sans lactose
he: נטול לקטוז
hr: bez laktoze
hu: Laktózmentes, laktóz mentes, természetes módon laktózmentes
id: Bebas laktosa
it: Senza lattosio, Naturalmente senza lattosio
ja: ラクトースフリー
ko: 락토스 프리
lt: Be laktozės
lv: Bez laktozes
ms: Tanpa laktosa
nb: Laktosefri, Uten laktose, Naturlig laktosefri
nl: Lactosevrij, Vrij van lactose
pl: Bez laktozy
pt: Sem lactose, 0% lactose, livre de lactose
ro: Fără lactoză
ru: Без лактозы
sk: Bez laktozy
sl: Brez laktoze
sq: Pa laktozë
sv: Laktosfri, Laktosfritt, Naturligt laktosfri
th: ไม่มีแลคโตส
tr: Laktozsuz
uk: Без лактози
vi: Không chứa lactose
zh: 无乳糖

en: Contains lactose
bg: Съдържа лактоза
ca: Conté lactosa
de: Enthält Laktose
es: Contiene lactosa
fi: Sisältää laktoosia
fr: Contient du lactose
hu: Tartalmaz laktózt
it: Contiene lattosio
nl: Bevat melkeiwit, Bevat lactose
pl: Zawiera laktozę
pt: Contém lactose
ru: Содержит лактозу

en: No lecithine, lecithine-free
bg: Без лецитин
ca: Sense lecitina, Lliure de lecitina
de: ohne Lecithin
es: Sin lecitina
fi: lesitiinitön, ei lesitiiniä, ilman lesitiiniä
fr: Sans lécithine
hu: Lecitinmentes, lecitin mentes
it: Senza lecitina
nl: Lecithinevrij
pt: Sem lecitina
ru: Без лецитина

en: No soja lecithine, Without soja lecithine
bg: Без соев лецитин
de: Kein Soja-Lecithin
es: Sin lecitina de soya, Sin lecitina de soja
fi: soijalesitiinitön, ei soijalesitiiniä, ilman soijalesitiiniä
fr: Sans lécithine de soja
hu: Szójalecitin nélkül, Szójalecitinmentes
it: Senza lecitina di soia
pt: Sem lecitina de soja
ru: Без соевого лецитина

en: No milk, milk-free, dairy-free, no dairy, without milk, free from dairy
bg: Без мляко
ca: Sense llet, Lliure de llet, Lliure de làctics, Sense làctics
da: Mælkefri, Fri for mælkebestanddele
de: Ohne Milch, Milchfrei, Frei von Milch
es: Sin leche
fi: maidoton, maitotuotteeton, ei maitoa, ilman maitoa
fr: sans lait, sans produits laitiers
he: ללא חלב
hr: bez mlijeka
hu: Tej nélkül, tejmentes
it: Senza latte
nb: Uten melk, Fri fro melk
nl: Melkvrij
pl: Bez mleka, Bez zawartości mleka
pt: Sem leite, 0% leite, sem produtos lácteos, sem produtos láteos, sem lacticínios, sem laticínios
ru: Без молока
sv: Mjölkfri, Fri från mjölk, Fri från mjölkprodukter, icke mejeriingrediens
th: ไม่มีส่วนผสมของนม

en: Without addition of dairy products
de: Ohne Zusatz von Milchprodukten
es: Sin productos lácteos añadidos
fi: ei lisättyjä maitotuotteita
fr: Sans ajout de produit laitiers
hr: Bez dodataka mliječnih proizvoda
it: Senza aggiunta di latticini
nl: Zonder toevoeging van zuivel
pt: Sem adição de produtos lácteos, sem adição de lacticínios, sem adição de laticínios
ru: Без добавления молочных продуктов

en: Contains milk
bg: Съдържа мляко
ca: Conté llet
da: Indeholder mælk
de: Enthält Milch
es: Contiene leche
fi: sisältää maitoa
fr: Contient du lait
he: מכיל חלב
hu: Tejtartalmú, Tejet tartalmaz
it: Contiene latte
nl: Bevat melk
pl: Zawiera mleko, Z mlekiem
pt: Contém leite
ru: Содержит молоко
th: มีส่วนผสมของนม